District of Columbia statutes.
44-112.01

Appeals from actions of the Mayor.

A person or licensee aggrieved by an action of the Mayor under this chapter may appeal the Mayor’s action by filing a request for hearing as provided in § 44-505.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1201, 47 DCR 2647